Vermont, session 2025-2026, H101.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 212 is amended to read:
§ 212. SECRETARY’S DUTIES GENERALLY
The Secretary shall execute those policies adopted by the State Board in the
legal exercise of its powers and shall:
(1) Coordinate the educational work of the public schools with higher
education in the State.
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 2 of 7
(2) Identify the educational goals of the public schools, provide
alternative methods of attaining those goals, and promote education in the
State.
(3) Evaluate the program of instruction in the public schools.
(4) Advise the General Assembly concerning proposed laws affecting
the public schools.
(5) Supervise and direct the execution of the laws relating to the public
schools and ensure compliance.
(6) Supervise the expenditure and distribution of all money appropriated
by the State under the provisions of this title for public schools.
(7) Arrange conferences and summer schools for superintendents and
teachers and employ suitable speakers, lecturers, and instructors for the same;
fix the amount of tuition for the instruction; provide for educational gatherings,
institutes, summer schools, and other supplementary educational activities; and
provide for cooperation with the Board of Libraries established by 22 V.S.A.
§ 602 or the State Librarian.
(8) Inform citizens of the condition of and opportunities within the
public education system and provide other educational publicity for the
enlightenment and well-being of the citizens of the State.
(9) Establish requirements for information to be submitted by school
districts, including necessary statistical data and other information and ensure,
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 3 of 7
to the extent possible, that data are reported in a uniform way. Data collected
under this subdivision shall include budget surplus amounts, reserve fund
amounts, and information concerning the purpose and use of any reserve funds.
(10) Make recommendations to school boards regarding transportation
policies.
(11) Provide an educational facilities planning service to make available
technical assistance and comprehensive information on school construction,
school systems design, component technology and suppliers, and similar
subjects to public schools, school districts, and independent schools, for the
purpose of helping them to achieve flexibility and economy in construction, to
retain the potential for modification and expansion of educational facilities,
and to attain the lowest maintenance costs consistent with educational needs.
(12) Distribute at his or her the Secretary’s discretion upon request to
approved independent schools appropriate forms and materials relating to the
education quality standards for elementary and secondary students.
(13) Ensure the provision of services to children and adolescents with a
severe emotional disturbance in coordination with the Departments of Mental
Health, for Children and Families, and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent
Living pursuant to the provisions of 33 V.S.A. chapter 43.
(14) Annually, communicate to each superintendent a list of information
that a supervisory union, a school board, a school district, a school, a school
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 4 of 7
district employee, or a supervisory union employee is required under State or
federal law to make available to the electorate, community members, parents,
or students. It is the intent of this subdivision that the Secretary shall make a
good faith effort to compile a complete list of the information to be made
available. Due to the difficult nature of compiling such a list, it is also the
intent that failure to include relevant information on the list shall not constitute
grounds for an action against the Secretary.
(15) Annually, with the Commissioner of Health, shall jointly inform
superintendents and principals of appropriate practices regarding students with
life-threatening allergies and chronic illnesses; and prepare and distribute
policies, training materials, and school guidelines for managing students with
life-threatening allergies and chronic illnesses, including family
responsibilities, school responsibilities, and student responsibilities.
(16) Annually, convene a meeting of directors of Vermont educator
preparation programs and representatives of school boards, superintendents,
principals, educators, and the Vermont Standards Board to determine subject
and geographic areas in which there is a critical need for educators and to
discuss ways to meet the need.
(17) Encourage and facilitate collaboration among school districts and
supervisory unions to share information and expertise regarding low-incidence
special education needs.
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 5 of 7
(18) Annually, inform superintendents and principals of regional
resources available to assist schools to provide instruction in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and the use of automated external defibrillators and provide
updated information to the education community regarding the provision of a
comprehensive health education.
(19) Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to
help districts share information about educational programs and practices that
improve student performance. Educational programs and practices include
those designed to create and sustain a safe learning environment.
(20) Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make
available to school boards sample ballot language for issues that may be
decided by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.
(21) Prepare a budget for the Agency and submit it to the Governor after
review by the State Board.
(22) Annually, prior to September 1, present the Governor’s education
policy priorities to the State Board.
(23) Provide statewide technical assistance to school districts and
supervisory unions on the implementation of all statewide requirements,
including:
(A) professional development;
(B) curriculum development;
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 6 of 7
(C) education quality standards implementation;
(D) district quality standards implementation;
(E) statewide testing;
(F) rule changes; and
(G) all statewide initiatives.
Sec. 2. AGENCY OF EDUCATION PROGRAM EVALUATION AND
ORGANIZATIONAL ANALYSIS; REPORT
(a) The Secretary of Education shall conduct a comprehensive program
evaluation and organizational analysis of the Agency of Education, which shall
include:
(1) an evaluation of the culture of the Agency;
(2) an Agency-wide pay scale analysis;
(3) an inventory of the training and reporting requirements currently
required of school districts by the Agency and the origin of those requirements;
and
(4) any other component of the Agency the Secretary deems relevant.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary shall issue a written report
to the Senate and House Committees on Education with the findings of the
evaluation and analysis required under subsection (a) of this section. The
report shall include the Secretary’s recommendations for any changes to the
Agency, efforts already underway to complete such changes, a timeline for any
VT LEG #378907 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.101
2025 Page 7 of 7
remaining changes, and any legislative changes necessary to achieve the
Secretary’s recommendations.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378907 v.2